Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.050

License renewals.

If an application for renewal of a commission merchant, dealer, broker or cash buyer license is not filed prior to the prescribed renewal date a penalty of twenty-five percent shall be assessed and added to the original fee and shall be paid by the applicant before the renewal license shall be issued.

[ 1991 c 109 s 17; 1959 c 139 s 5.]